test/src/morphology/V_1а_Perf_прочитать_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Verb - прочитать : # Verb - full paradigm
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Inf: прочита́ть
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Msc+Sg: прочита́л
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Neu+Sg: прочита́ло
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Fem+Sg: прочита́ла
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Pst+Pl: прочита́ли

    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg1: прочита́ю
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg2: прочита́ешь
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Sg3: прочита́ет
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl1: прочита́ем
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl2: прочита́ете
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Fut+Pl3: прочита́ют
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Imp+Sg2: прочита́й
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+Imp+Pl2: прочита́йте
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv: прочита́в
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прочита́вши
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Inf: прочита́ть
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Msc+Sg: прочита́л
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Neu+Sg: прочита́ло
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Fem+Sg: прочита́ла
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Pst+Pl: прочита́ли

    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg1: прочита́ю
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg2: прочита́ешь
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Sg3: прочита́ет
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl1: прочита́ем
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl2: прочита́ете
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Fut+Pl3: прочита́ют
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Imp+Sg2: прочита́й
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+Imp+Pl2: прочита́йте
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv: прочита́в
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Adv+Use/Obs: прочита́вши
    
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Nom: прочита́вший
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: прочита́вший
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: прочита́вшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Gen: прочита́вшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Loc: прочита́вшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Dat: прочита́вшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Ins: прочита́вшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Nom: прочита́вшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Acc: прочита́вшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Gen: прочита́вшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Loc: прочита́вшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Dat: прочита́вшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Ins: прочита́вшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Nom: прочита́вшая
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Acc: прочита́вшую
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Gen: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Loc: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Dat: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Ins: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Nom: прочита́вшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Acc+Inan: прочита́вшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Acc+Anim: прочита́вших
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Gen: прочита́вших
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Loc: прочита́вших
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Dat: прочита́вшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstAct+Pl+Ins: прочита́вшими

    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Nom: прочита́вший
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: прочита́вший
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: прочита́вшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Gen: прочита́вшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Loc: прочита́вшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Dat: прочита́вшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Msc+Sg+Ins: прочита́вшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Nom: прочита́вшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Acc: прочита́вшее
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Gen: прочита́вшего
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Loc: прочита́вшем
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Dat: прочита́вшему
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Neu+Sg+Ins: прочита́вшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Nom: прочита́вшая
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Acc: прочита́вшую
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Gen: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Loc: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Dat: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Fem+Sg+Ins: прочита́вшей
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Nom: прочита́вшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Acc+Inan: прочита́вшие
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Acc+Anim: прочита́вших
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Gen: прочита́вших
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Loc: прочита́вших
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Dat: прочита́вшим
    прочитать+V+Perf+IV+PstAct+Pl+Ins: прочита́вшими

    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Nom: прочи́танный
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Inan: прочи́танный
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Acc+Anim: прочи́танного
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Gen: прочи́танного
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Loc: прочи́танном
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Dat: прочи́танному
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Ins: прочи́танным
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Nom: прочи́танное
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Acc: прочи́танное
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Gen: прочи́танного
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Loc: прочи́танном
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Dat: прочи́танному
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Ins: прочи́танным
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Nom: прочи́танная
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Acc: прочи́танную
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Gen: прочи́танной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Loc: прочи́танной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Dat: прочи́танной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Ins: прочи́танной
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Nom: прочи́танные
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Acc+Inan: прочи́танные
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Acc+Anim: прочи́танных
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Gen: прочи́танных
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Loc: прочи́танных
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Dat: прочи́танным
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Ins: прочи́танными
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Msc+Sg+Pred: прочи́тан
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Neu+Sg+Pred: прочи́тано
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Fem+Sg+Pred: прочи́тана
    прочитать+V+Perf+TV+PstPss+Pl+Pred: прочи́таны

    
